Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2 State Authorization and Regulation

3-7-20.
Issuance of alcoholic beverage licenses to private clubs by commissioner generally; promulgation of rules and regulations generally; privileges conferred by licenses.

The commissioner may issue alcoholic beverage licenses to bona fide private clubs in any county or municipality within the state and may promulgate such regulations as he deems necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter after the approval of such authority by an election held pursuant to Code Section 3-7-41 or 3-7-42. These licenses shall authorize the sale of distilled spirits by the drink for consumption only on the premises where sold.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1155, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-6102, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-7-21.
License fees; prelicense investigation fee.

The license fees for a club shall be the same fees as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 3-4-111.1 for the sale of distilled spirits in licensed public places of business; and, in addition, a prelicense investigation fee of $100.00 shall be required.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1155, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-6103, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 55.

3-7-22.
Promulgation of rules and regulations as to sale, possession, and use of alcoholic beverages in private clubs.

The commissioner may promulgate such reasonable regulations as are necessary and appropriate to regulate the sale, possession, and use of alcoholic beverages in private clubs.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1155, § 5; Code 1933, § 5A-6106, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.